Utah statutes.
26-1-30.5.   Duty to establish pilot program for monitoring quality in health care.

(1) (a)  Beginning July 1, 2010, the department shall develop a voluntary demonstration project to promote and monitor early intervention and resolution of unanticipated outcomes from medical care received by a patient.

(b)  Implementation and execution of the demonstration project is contingent upon the amendment of a rule of evidence to protect the statements, affirmations, gestures, or conduct described in Section 78B-3-422.

(c)  The department shall adopt administrative rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, which establish:

(i)  the principles upon which the demonstration project shall be based; and

(ii)  the method for implementation and evaluation of an open and honest dialogue between a health care provider and a patient, and the patient's representative, after an unanticipated event resulting from medical care provided to the patient.

(2)  The demonstration project shall include at least the following:

(a)  a collaborative, public-private effort to:

(i)  avoid expensive and acrimonious litigation as a result of an unanticipated medical outcome; and

(ii)  replace litigation with open and honest dialogue about issues raised in the course of a patient's medical care which resulted in the unanticipated outcome;

(b)  a process for evaluating the effectiveness of the demonstration project in:

(i)  preventing litigation of medical malpractice claims; and

(ii)  providing appropriate and timely resolution of medical malpractice claims;

(c)  a report to the Legislature's Judiciary, Law Enforcement, and Criminal Justice Interim Committee no later than November 30, 2012, which shall include the results of the demonstration project.

